Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5317.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) The county board of commissioners of a county, by resolution adopted by a 2/3 vote of all its members, may create a county parks and recreation commission, which shall must be under the general control of the county board of commissioners. (2) The county parks and recreation commission shall must consist of the following members: (a) The chairperson of the county road commission or another road commissioner designated by the board of county road commissioners. (b) The county drain commissioner or an employee of the drain commissioner's office designated in writing by the drain commissioner.the county drain commissioner's designee. (c) One of the following: (i) In a county that elects a county executive under section 9 of 1973 PA 139, MCL 45.559, the county executive or a designee of the county executive.the county executive's designee. (ii) In a county with a population of 1,000,000 or less, the chairperson of the county planning commission or another member of the county planning commission designated by the county planning commission. In a county that does not have a county planning commission, the chairperson of the regional planning commission shall serve on the county parks and recreation commission if that person individual is a resident of that county. If the chairperson of the regional planning commission is not a resident of that county, then the county board of commissioners shall, by a 2/3 vote, appoint a member of the regional planning commission who is a resident of that county to serve on the county parks and recreation commission. (d) Seven Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, 7 members appointed by the county board of commissioners, not less than 1 and not more than 3 of whom shall must be members of the county board of commissioners. Beginning January 1, 2027, if a county has a population of less than 100,000, the county board of commissioners of that county may reduce the number of members appointed under this subdivision to 4 members, not less than 1 and not more than 3 of whom must be members of the county board of commissioners. (e) For counties with a population greater than 750,000 but less than 1,000,000, the county board of commissioners shall appoint a neighborhood representative. The appointee under this subdivision shall must be an officer of the homeowners or property owners association that represents the largest area geographically that is located totally or partially within 1,000 feet of the property boundary of the most frequently used county park who is willing to serve on the county parks and recreation commission. If a homeowners or property owners association is not located within 1,000 feet of that park or no officer is willing to serve, then the appointee shall must be a resident who lives within 1/2 mile of that park and who is willing to serve on the county parks and recreation commission. If no resident lives within 1/2 mile of that park or no resident is willing to serve, then the appointee shall must be a resident of the city, village, or township in which that park is located who is willing to serve on the county parks and recreation commission. The first appointment under this subdivision shall must be made not more than 60 days from October 17, 2003 or not more than 60 days from after the date a county qualifies for an appointment under this subdivision. (3) Of the members first appointed by the county board of commissioners, 2 shall must be appointed for a term ending 1 year from the following January 1, 2 for a term ending 2 years from the following January 1, and 3 for a term ending 3 years from the following January 1. The first member appointed by a qualifying county under subsection (2)(e) shall must be appointed for a term ending 2 years from the following January 1. From then on, each appointed member shall must be appointed for a term of 3 years and until his or her the member's successor is appointed and qualified. Each term shall must expire at noon on January 1. A vacancy shall must be filled by the county board of commissioners for the unexpired term. (4) The county parks and recreation commission is an agency of the county. The county board of commissioners may make rules and regulations with respect to the county parks and recreation commission as the county board of commissioners considers advisable. The members of the county parks and recreation commission are not full-time officers. The county board of commissioners shall fix the compensation of the members.